Utah statutes.
78B-6-303.   Warrant of attachment or commitment order to show cause.
If the contempt is not committed in the immediate view and presence of the
court or judge, a warrant of attachment may be issued to bring the person
charged to answer.  If there is no previous arrest, a warrant of commitment
may, upon notice, or upon an order to show cause, be granted.  A warrant of
commitment may not be issued without a previous attachment to answer, or a
notice or order to show cause.
